Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB114.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 150.645 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An owner, lessee, or occupant of premises who gives permission to another person to hunt, fish, trap, camp,
[or ]hike, rock climb, boulder, or rappel upon the premises shall owe no duty to keep the premises safe for
entry or use by the person or to give warning of any hazardous conditions on the premises, and the owner,
lessee, or occupant, by giving his or her permission, does not thereby extend any assurance that the premises
are safe for such purpose, or constitute the person to whom permission is granted an invitee to whom a duty of
care is owed. The owner, lessee, or occupant giving permission for any of the purposes stated above shall not
be liable for any injury to any person or property caused by the negligent acts of any person to whom
permission is granted. This section shall not limit the liability which would otherwise exist for willful and
malicious failure to guard or to warn against a dangerous condition, use, structure, or activity; or for injury
suffered in any case where permission to hunt, fish, trap, camp, [or ]hike, rock climb, boulder, or rappel was
granted for a consideration other than the consideration, if any, as set forth in KRS 411.190(1)(d), paid to said
owner, lessee, or occupant by the state. The word "premises" as used in this section includes lands, rocks,
boulders, cliffs, private ways, and any buildings and structures thereon. Nothing in this section limits in any
way any liability which otherwise exists.
(2) Department employees who participate in bona fide wildlife management practices are agents of the
department and state and, in the event property damage does occur, a claim for property damages may only be
brought in the Board of Claims pursuant to KRS 49.040 to 49.180.
Section 2. KRS 411.190 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Land" means land, rocks, boulders, cliffs, roads, water, watercourses, private ways and buildings,
structures, and machinery or equipment when attached to the realty;
(b) "Owner" means the possessor of a fee, reversionary, or easement interest, a tenant, lessee, occupant, or
person in control of the premises;
(c) "Recreational purpose" includes, but is not limited to, any of the following, or any combination thereof:
hunting, fishing, swimming, boating, camping, picnicking, hiking, rock climbing, bouldering,
rappelling, bicycling, horseback riding, pleasure driving, nature study, water-skiing, winter sports, and
viewing or enjoying historical, archaeological, scenic, or scientific sites; and
(d) "Charge" means the admission price or fee asked in return for invitation or permission to enter or go
upon the land but does not include fees for general use permits issued by a government agency for
access to public lands if the permits are valid for a period of not less than thirty (30) days.
(2) The purpose of this section is to encourage owners of land to make land and water areas available to the public
for recreational purposes by limiting their liability toward persons entering thereon for such purposes.
(3) Except as specifically recognized by or provided in subsection (6) of this section, an owner of land owes no
duty of care to keep the premises safe for entry or use by others for recreational purposes, or to give any
warning of a dangerous condition, use, structure, or activity on the premises to persons entering for such
purposes.
(4) Except as specifically recognized by or provided in subsection (6) of this section, an owner of land who either
directly or indirectly invites or permits without charge any person to use the property for recreation purposes
does not thereby:
(a) Extend any assurance that the premises are safe for any purpose;
(b) Confer upon the person the legal status of an invitee or licensee to whom a duty of care is owed; or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) Assume responsibility for or incur liability for any injury to person or property caused by an act or
omission of those persons.
(5) Unless otherwise agreed in writing, the provisions of subsections (3) and (4) of this section shall be deemed
applicable to the duties and liability of an owner of land leased to the state or any subdivision thereof for
recreational purposes.
(6) Nothing in this section limits in any way any liability which otherwise exists:
(a) For willful or malicious failure to guard or warn against a dangerous condition, use, structure, or
activity; or
(b) For injury suffered in any case where the owner of land charges the person or persons who enter or go
on the land for the recreational use thereof, except that in the case of land leased to the state or a
subdivision thereof, any consideration received by the owner for the lease shall not be deemed a charge
within the meaning of this section.
(7) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(a) Create a duty of care or ground of liability for injury to persons or property;
(b) Relieve any person using the land of another for recreational purposes from any obligation which he or
she may have in the absence of this section to exercise care in his or her use of the land and in his or
her activities thereon, or from the legal consequences of failure to employ such care; or
(c) Ripen into a claim for adverse possession, absent a claim of title or legal right.
(8) No action for the recovery of real property, including establishment of prescriptive easement, right-of-way, or
adverse possession, may be brought by any person whose claim is based on use solely for recreational
purposes.
Signed by Governor March 31, 2025.